Mississippi, session 2026, HB166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the State Department of Education, in conjunction with the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning acting for and on behalf of the University of Mississippi Medical Center (UMMC), shall establish and implement a program known as the "Health Careers Academy" for public school students in Grades 9 through 12, the purpose of which will be to stimulate interest in science, mathematics, language arts, critical thinking and the health care professions, especially among underserved and underrepresented populations in Mississippi, to increase awareness of the urgent need for health care professionals in our state and to raise ACT scores through preparatory instruction. (2)  The academy established under subsection (1) of this section for the introduction of students to a potential career in the health care professions must be a six-week nonresidential summer program at UMMC, during which time students must be provided onsite hands-on instruction to increase the students' preparation for a premedical or allied health curriculum and to strengthen academic competitiveness.  The lecture-based portions of instruction in the academy must be conducted by instructors with adequate certification in science, mathematics and language arts who are licensed by the State Department of Education or who teach those subject areas at the collegiate level. (3)  The State Department of Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall develop jointly the criteria and process to be used in a random selection of candidates to participate in the academy.  The criteria and process must be nondiscriminatory in nature and may not refuse admission into the academy on the basis of race, color, age, disability, gender, religion, national origin, sexual orientation or prior academic achievement. (4)  Eligibility for participation in the academy is limited to students who: (a)  Maintain a cumulative 2.25 grade point average on a 4.0 scale; (b)  Are recommended by their science or mathematics teachers, or both; (c)  Have a consistent record of attendance; (d)  Display positive attitudes, character and citizenship; (e)  Express a desire to expand their knowledge of health care and medicine; (f)  Are residents of Mississippi; and (g)  Present proof of having health insurance or Medicaid. However, before any student is accepted for participation under the criteria of this subsection, that student's parent, legal guardian or custodian must submit written authorization agreeing to the student's participation in the academy. (5)  The Health Careers Academy must include, but not be limited to, the following components: (a)  An orientation, which the parents are encouraged to attend; (b)  Classes in mathematics, science, language arts, critical thinking and study skills; (c)  ACT instruction and practice exams; (d)  Instructional interaction with UMMC medical students; (e)  Presentations from UMMC professionals; (f)  Health-related hands-on activities; (g)  CPR certification; (h)  A graduation ceremony; and (i)  ACT registration as needed. (6)  The Health Careers Academy must consist of a full day of academic, research or laboratory instruction beginning at 8:00 a.m. and lasting until 3:00 p.m. daily on Monday through Friday of each week during the six (6) weeks of the academy.  During each week, two (2) afternoons must be dedicated to ACT preparation and the remaining three (3) days must be dedicated to health care career preparation and volunteerism. (7)  Students participating in the academy must complete a series of tasks designed to enhance their knowledge of the health care professions and must complete a research project to be judged by the faculty of UMMC. SECTION 2. Participation in the academy must be limited to Mississippi residents who are entering Grades 9 through 12 in a public school and who have submitted to the State Department of Education a completed application on the form designed and supplied by the department and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning.  The department shall make applications available to each school district on October 1 of each year and shall establish the deadline for accepting applications.  Upon the closing date for acceptance of applications, the department shall forward the completed applications to the Vice Chancellor for Health Affairs at the University of Mississippi Medical Center, who shall determine the number of openings available for participation in the academy. SECTION 3. Students selected to participate in the academy must be provided, as an incentive to participate, a stipend in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for the completion of the academy. SECTION 4. (1)  There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the "Health Careers Academy Trust Fund."  The purpose of the fund is to provide financial support to local school districts and UMMC for start-up costs and costs associated with implementing and operating the Health Careers Academy. The fund may consist of monies obtained from grants from the federal government, funds made available by the Legislature, and grants, gifts, devises and donations from any public or private source.  The State Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall administer the fund and may apply for any grants from the federal government or private sources. (2)  The State Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning jointly shall adopt rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this section.  If sufficient funds are available for this purpose, monies from the Health Careers Academy Trust Fund must be allocated to UMMC in accordance with the procedures established by the State Board of Education and the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.